Utah statutes.
73-18-7.4.   Canceled, suspended, or revoked registration or certificate of
title to be returned.
If the division or its authorized agent cancels, suspends, or revokes the
registration or certificate of title of a motorboat, sailboat, or outboard
motor, the owner shall immediately return the canceled, suspended, or revoked
registration card, registration decal, or certificate of title to the division
or authorized agent.
